Hawaii statutes.
PART VII.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

[§392-101] Limitation of fees. Any
individual claiming benefits in any proceeding before the department or the
referee may be represented by counsel or other duly authorized agent; but no
such counsel or agent shall either charge or receive for such services more
than an amount approved by the department or referee, and such amount shall in
no case exceed ten per cent of the total amount of benefits received as a
result of such proceeding. Any person who violates this section shall, for
each such offense, be fined not less than $50 nor more than $500 or imprisoned
not more than six months, or both. [L 1971, c 109, §1(m)]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next